Illinois, session 104th, SB3298.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 11-2 and 11-3 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/11-2)  (from Ch. 46, par. 11-2)7    Sec. 11-2. Election precincts. 8    (a) The County Board in each county, except in counties 9having a population of 3,000,000 inhabitants or over, shall, 10at its regular meeting in June or an adjourned meeting in July, 11divide its election precincts so that each precinct shall 12contain, as near as may be practicable, 1,200 registered 13voters who cast a ballot in person on the day of the most 14recent general election. Insofar as is practicable, each 15precinct shall be situated within a single congressional, 16legislative and representative district and in not more than 17one County Board district and one municipal ward. In order to 18situate each precinct within a single district or ward, the 19County Board shall change the boundaries of election precincts 20after each decennial census as soon as is practicable 21following the completion of congressional and legislative 22redistricting, except that, in 2021, the county board shall 23change the boundaries at a regular or special meeting within   SB3298- 2 -LRB104 19828 SPS 33278 b160 days after November 15, 2021 (the effective date of Public 2Act 102-668) this amendatory Act of the 102nd General 3Assembly. In determining whether a division of precincts 4should be made, the county board may anticipate increased 5voter registration in any precinct in which there is in 6progress new construction of dwelling units which will be 7occupied by voters more than 30 days before the next election. 8Each district shall be composed of contiguous territory in as 9compact form as can be for the convenience of the electors 10voting therein. The several county boards in establishing 11districts shall describe them by metes and bounds and number 12them. 13    (b) The And so often thereafter as it shall appear by the 14number of votes cast at the general election held in November 15of any year, that any election district or undivided election 16precinct contains more than 1,200 registered voters, the 17County Board of the county in which an election the district or 18precinct or election precincts are located may be, shall at 19its regular meeting in June, or an adjourned meeting in July 20next, after such November election, redivide, consolidate, or 21readjust such election district or election precinct or 22election precincts, so that no district or election precinct 23shall contain more than the number of votes above specified in 24subsection (a). 25    If for any reason the County Board fails in any year to 26redivide or readjust the election districts or election   SB3298- 3 -LRB104 19828 SPS 33278 b1precinct or election precincts, then the districts or 2precincts as then existing shall continue until the next 3regular June meeting of the County Board; at which regular 4June meeting or an adjourned meeting in July the County Board 5shall redivide or readjust the election districts or election 6precincts in manner as herein required. When at any meeting of 7the County Board any redivision, readjustment, or change in 8name or number of election districts or election precincts is 9made by the County Board, the County Clerk shall immediately 10notify the State Board of Elections of such redivision, 11readjustment, or change. The County Board in every case shall 12fix and establish the places for holding elections in its 13respective county and all elections shall be held at the 14places so fixed. The polling places shall in all cases be upon 15the ground floor in the front room, the entrance to which is in 16a highway or public street which is at least 40 feet wide, and 17is as near the center of the voting population of the precinct 18as is practicable, and for the convenience of the greatest 19number of electors to vote thereat; provided, however, where 20the County Board is unable to secure a suitable polling place 21within the boundaries of a precinct, it may select a polling 22place at the most conveniently located suitable place outside 23the precinct; but in no case shall an election be held in any 24room used or occupied as a saloon, dramshop, bowling alley or 25as a place of resort for idlers and disreputable persons, 26billiard hall or in any room connected therewith by doors or   SB3298- 4 -LRB104 19828 SPS 33278 b1hallways. No person shall be permitted to vote at any election 2except at the polling place for the precinct in which he 3resides, except as otherwise provided in this Section or 4Article 19 of this Code Act. In counties having a population of 53,000,000 inhabitants or over the County Board shall divide 6its election precincts and shall fix and establish places for 7holding elections as hereinbefore provided during the month of 8January instead of at its regular meeting in June or at an 9adjourned meeting in July.10    However, in the event that additional divisions of 11election precincts are indicated after a division made by the 12County Board in the month of January, such additional 13divisions may be made by the County Board in counties having a 14population of 3,000,000 inhabitants or over, at the regular 15meeting in June or at adjourned meeting in July. The county 16board of such county may divide or readjust precincts at any 17meeting of the county board when the voter registration in a 18precinct has increased beyond 1,800 registered voters and an 19election is scheduled before the next regular January or June 20meeting of the county board.21    (c) When in any city, village or incorporated town 22territory has been annexed thereto or disconnected therefrom, 23which annexation or disconnection becomes effective after 24election precincts or election districts have been established 25as above provided in this Section, the clerk of the 26municipality shall inform the county clerk thereof as provided   SB3298- 5 -LRB104 19828 SPS 33278 b1in Section 4-21, 5-28.1, or 6-31.1, whichever is applicable. 2In the event that a regular meeting of the County Board is to 3be held after such notification and before any election, the 4County Board shall, at its next regular meeting, establish new 5election precinct lines in affected territory. In the event 6that no regular meeting of the County Board is to be held 7before such election the county clerk shall, within 5 days 8after being so informed, call a special meeting of the county 9board on a day fixed by him not more than 20 days thereafter 10for the purpose of establishing election precincts or election 11districts in the affected territory for the ensuing elections.12    At any consolidated primary or consolidated election at 13which municipal officers are to be elected, and at any 14emergency referendum at which a public question relating to a 15municipality is to be voted on, notwithstanding any other 16provision of this Code, the election authority shall establish 17a polling place within such municipality, upon the request of 18the municipal council or board of trustees at least 60 days 19before the election and provided that the municipality 20provides a suitable polling place. To accomplish this purpose, 21the election authority may establish an election precinct 22constituting a single municipality of under 500 population for 23all elections, notwithstanding the minimum precinct size 24otherwise specified herein.25    (d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Section 26the above, when there are no more than 50 registered voters in   SB3298- 6 -LRB104 19828 SPS 33278 b1a precinct who are entitled to vote in a local government or 2school district election, the election authority having 3jurisdiction over the precinct is authorized to reassign such 4voters to one or more polling places in adjacent precincts, 5within or without the election authority's jurisdiction, for 6that election. For the purposes of such local government or 7school district election only, the votes of the reassigned 8voters shall be tallied and canvassed as votes from the 9precinct of the polling place to which such voters have been 10reassigned. The election authority having jurisdiction over 11the precinct shall approve all administrative and polling 12place procedures. Such procedures shall take into account 13voter convenience, and ensure that the integrity of the 14election process is maintained and that the secrecy of the 15ballot is not violated.16    (e) Except in the event of a fire, flood or total loss of 17heat in a place fixed or established by any county board or 18election authority pursuant to this Section as a polling place 19for an election, no election authority shall change the 20location of a polling place so established for any precinct 21after notice of the place of holding the election for that 22precinct has been given as required under Article 12 unless 23the election authority notifies all registered voters in the 24precinct of the change in location by first class mail in 25sufficient time for such notice to be received by the 26registered voters in the precinct at least one day prior to the   SB3298- 7 -LRB104 19828 SPS 33278 b1date of the election.2    (f) The provisions of this Section apply to all precincts, 3including those where voting machines or electronic voting 4systems are used.5(Source: P.A. 102-668, eff. 11-15-21; revised 6-24-25.) 6    (10 ILCS 5/11-3)  (from Ch. 46, par. 11-3)7    Sec. 11-3. Election precincts. 8    (a) It shall be the duty of the Board of Commissioners 9established by Article 6 of this Act, within 2 months after its 10first organization, to divide the city, village or 11incorporated town which may adopt or is operating under 12Article 6, into election precincts, each of which shall be 13situated within a single congressional, legislative and 14representative district insofar as is practicable and in not 15more than one County Board district and one municipal ward; in 16order to situate each precinct within a single district or 17ward, the Board of Election Commissioners shall change the 18boundaries of election precincts after each decennial census 19as soon as is practicable following the completion of 20congressional and legislative redistricting and such precincts 21shall contain as nearly as practicable 1,800 registered 22voters : (i) 1,200 registered voters if the precinct is located 23in a county with fewer than 3,000,000 inhabitants; or (ii) 241,800 registered voters if the precinct is located in a county 25with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants.   SB3298- 8 -LRB104 19828 SPS 33278 b1    (b) Within 90 days after each presidential election, such 2board in a city with fewer than 500,000 inhabitants, village 3or incorporated town shall revise and rearrange such precincts 4on the basis of the votes cast at such election, making such 5precincts to contain, as near as practicable, 1,200 registered 6voters or 1,800 registered voters, as applicable. However, any 7apartment building in which more than 1,200 or 1,800 8registered voters, as applicable, reside may be made a single 9precinct even though the vote in such precinct exceeds 1,200 10or 1,800 registered voters, as applicable. 11    (c) Within 90 days after each presidential election, a 12board in a city with more than 500,000 inhabitants shall 13revise and rearrange such precincts on the basis of the votes 14cast at such election, making such precincts to contain, as 15near as practicable: (i) 1,200 registered voters if the 16precinct is located in a county with fewer than 3,000,000 17inhabitants; or (ii) 1,800 registered voters if the precinct 18is located in a county with 3,000,000 or more inhabitants. 19However, any apartment building in which more than 1,200 20registered voters or 1,800 registered voters, as applicable, 21reside may be made a single precinct even though the vote in 22such precinct exceeds 1,200 or 1,800 registered voters, as 23applicable.24    (d) Immediately after the annexation of territory to the 25city, village or incorporated town becomes effective the Board 26of Election Commissioners shall revise and rearrange election   SB3298- 9 -LRB104 19828 SPS 33278 b1precincts therein to include such annexed territory.2    (e) Provided, however, that at any election where but one 3candidate is nominated and is to be voted upon at any election 4held in any political subdivision of a city, village or 5incorporated town, the Board of Election Commissioners shall 6have the power in such political subdivision to determine the 7number of voting precincts to be established in such political 8subdivision at such election, without reference to the number 9of qualified voters therein. The precincts in each ward, 10village or incorporated town shall be numbered from one 11upwards, consecutively, with no omission.12    (f) The provisions of this Section apply to all precincts, 13including those where voting machines or electronic voting 14systems are used.15(Source: P.A. 102-668, eff. 11-15-21.)